Maryland, session 2025, SB0819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0819*

SENATE BILL 819
Article – Education
7–101.
(a) All individuals who are 5 years old or older and under 21 shall be admitted
free of charge to the public schools of this State.
(b) (1) Except as provided in § 4–121 OF THIS ARTICLE, § 7–101.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AND § 7–301 of this title and in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each child
shall attend a public school in the county where the child is domiciled with the child’s
parent, guardian, or relative providing informal kinship care, as defined in subsection (c)
of this section.
7–101.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT ENROLLMENT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 5–201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “LOCAL CURRENT EXPENSE PER STUDENT” MEANS ALL
EXPENDITURES MADE BY A COUNTY FROM COUNTY APPROPRIATIONS, EXCEPT
STATE, FEDERAL, AND OTHER AID, FOR PUBLIC ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
EDUCATION IN THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR DIVIDED BY FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT
ENROLLMENT.
(4) “OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY” MEANS A POLICY ADOPTED BY A
COUNTY BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION THAT AUTHORIZES A CHILD
WHO IS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE TO ATTEND A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE STATE TO
ATTEND A PUBLIC SCHOOL FREE OF CHARGE IN A COUNTY OTHER THAN THE COUNTY
WHERE THE CHILD IS DOMICILED WITH THE CHILD’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN.
(5) “RECEIVING COUNTY” OR “RECEIVING SCHOOL” MEANS A
COUNTY OR A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN A COUNTY IN WHICH A STUDENT FROM A SENDING
COUNTY IS ENROLLED UNDER AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY.
(6) “SENDING COUNTY” OR “SENDING SCHOOL” MEANS A COUNTY OR
A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN A COUNTY IN WHICH A STUDENT IS DOMICILED WITH THE
STUDENT’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN.
(B) A COUNTY BOARD MAY ADOPT AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 819 3
(C) A COUNTY BOARD’S OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY SHALL:
(1) ALLOW A CHILD FROM A SENDING COUNTY TO BE ENROLLED IN A
RECEIVING SCHOOL FREE OF CHARGE;
(2) RESERVE SPACE FOR STUDENTS WHO WERE ENROLLED IN THE
RECEIVING SCHOOL DURING THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR FOR AUTOMATIC
ENROLLMENT IN EACH SUBSEQUENT SCHOOL YEAR WITHOUT AN APPLICATION;
(3) BE PUBLISHED ON THE COUNTY BOARD’S WEBSITE IN A MANNER
THAT IS EASILY ACCESSIBLE FROM THE HOMEPAGE; AND
(4) COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE
ANTIDISCRIMINATION LAWS.
(D) (1) A COUNTY BOARD THAT ADOPTS AN ENROLLMENT POLICY SHALL
ESTABLISH AN APPLICATION PROCESS THAT INCLUDES:
(I) AN APPLICATION FORM FOR A PARENT OR GUARDIAN TO
APPLY FREE OF CHARGE TO THE COUNTY BOARD TO ENROLL THE PARENT’S OR
GUARDIAN’S CHILD IN A RECEIVING SCHOOL;
(II) APPLICATION DEADLINES AND A PROCESS TO REQUEST A
WAIVER OF APPLICATION DEADLINES; AND
(III) AN APPLICATION REVIEW PROCESS THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) AN APPLICATION REVIEW PROCESS SHALL PROVIDE AN
ENROLLMENT PREFERENCE FOR CHILDREN WHO ARE:
1. ZONED TO THE SCHOOL; OR
2. SIBLINGS OF ENROLLED STUDENTS.
(II) IN INSTANCES WHERE THE TOTAL NUMBER OF
APPLICATIONS EXCEEDS THE RECEIVING SCHOOL’S OPEN ENROLLMENT CAPACITY,
AN APPLICATION REVIEW PROCESS SHALL USE AN EQUITABLE SELECTION PROCESS,
WHICH MAY BE A LOTTERY, THAT MAINTAINS THE ENROLLMENT PREFERENCES
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.

SENATE BILL 819
(III) AN APPLICATION REVIEW PROCESS SHALL PROVIDE
WRITTEN NOTIFICATION OF APPROVAL OR DENIAL WITHIN A REASONABLE AMOUNT
OF TIME AFTER SUBMISSION OF AN APPLICATION.
(3) (I) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL MAKE APPLICATION FORMS
AVAILABLE:
1. IN HARD COPY FORMAT AT THE OFFICES OF THE
COUNTY BOARD; AND
2. IN ELECTRONIC FORMAT ON THE COUNTY BOARD’S
WEBSITE IN A MANNER THAT IS EASILY ACCESSIBLE FROM THE HOMEPAGE.
(II) AVAILABLE APPLICATION FORMS SHALL INCLUDE
INSTRUCTIONS THAT THE OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY IS AVAILABLE FREE OF
CHARGE.
(E) A COUNTY BOARD THAT ADOPTS AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY SHALL:
(1) TRACK THE OPEN ENROLLMENT CAPACITY BY SCHOOL AND
GRADE LEVEL;
(2) PUBLISH A REPORT ON THE OPEN ENROLLMENT CAPACITY BY
SCHOOL AND GRADE LEVEL ON THE COUNTY BOARD’S WEBSITE IN A MANNER THAT
IS EASILY ACCESSIBLE FROM THE HOMEPAGE; AND
(3) UPDATE THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AT LEAST EVERY 4 WEEKS.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
COUNTY BOARD THAT ADOPTS AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY OR A SCHOOL
SUBJECT TO AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY TO:
(1) MAKE ALTERATIONS IN THE STRUCTURE OF A SCHOOL OR THE
ARRANGEMENT OR FUNCTIONS OF ROOMS WITHIN A SCHOOL;
(2) ESTABLISH OR OFFER ANY PARTICULAR PROGRAM IN A SCHOOL
IF THE PROGRAM IS NOT CURRENTLY OFFERED AT THE SCHOOL; OR
(3) ALTER OR WAIVE ANY ESTABLISHED ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR
PARTICIPATION IN A PARTICULAR PROGRAM, INCLUDING AGE REQUIREMENTS,
COURSE PREREQUISITES, AND REQUIRED LEVELS OF PERFORMANCE.

SENATE BILL 819 5
(G) A RECEIVING SCHOOL MAY DENY AN APPLICATION TO ENROLL A CHILD
FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING REASONS:
(1) LACK OF CAPACITY WITHIN THE SCHOOL;
(2) THE SCHOOL DOES NOT OFFER APPROPRIATE PROGRAMS OR IS
NOT STRUCTURED OR EQUIPPED WITH THE NECESSARY FACILITIES TO MEET ANY
SPECIAL NEEDS OF THE CHILD;
(3) THE SCHOOL DOES NOT OFFER A PARTICULAR PROGRAM
REQUESTED BY A CHILD’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN;
(4) THE CHILD DOES NOT MEET THE ESTABLISHED ELIGIBILITY
CRITERIA FOR PARTICIPATION IN A PROGRAM, INCLUDING AGE REQUIREMENTS,
COURSE PREREQUISITES, AND REQUIRED LEVELS OF PERFORMANCE;
(5) A DESEGREGATION PLAN IS IN EFFECT FOR THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM AND A DENIAL IS NECESSARY TO MAINTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
DESEGREGATION PLAN; OR
(6) THE CHILD HAS BEEN EXPELLED FROM A SCHOOL OR IS IN THE
PROCESS OF EXPULSION FOR HABITUAL DISRUPTION OF EDUCATIONAL ACTIVITIES.
(H) A SCHOOL SUBJECT TO AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY SHALL:
(1) CONSIDER ANY STUDENT ENROLLED UNDER AN OPEN
ENROLLMENT POLICY ENROLLED FOR ALL PURPOSES, INCLUDING SCHOOL
ATTENDANCE, ACCOUNTABILITY, AND GRADUATION; AND
(2) ACCEPT CREDITS TOWARD GRADUATION AWARDED TO A STUDENT
BY THE SENDING COUNTY.
(I) (1) A COUNTY BOARD THAT HAS ADOPTED AN OPEN ENROLLMENT
POLICY MAY PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION SERVICES TO A STUDENT.
(2) IF A COUNTY BOARD PROVIDES TRANSPORTATION SERVICES TO A
STUDENT ENROLLED UNDER THE OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY, THE RECEIVING
COUNTY BOARD SHALL PAY THE COSTS OF THE TRANSPORTATION SERVICES.
(J) (1) A RECEIVING COUNTY BOARD SHALL INCLUDE THE STUDENTS IN
A RECEIVING SCHOOL IN THE FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT ENROLLMENT COUNT.

SENATE BILL 819
(2) EACH FISCAL YEAR, FOR EACH STUDENT ENROLLED IN A SCHOOL
UNDER AN OPEN ENROLLMENT POLICY IN ANOTHER COUNTY, THE SENDING COUNTY
BOARD SHALL SEND THE RECEIVING COUNTY BOARD AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE
LESSER OF:
(I) THE LOCAL CURRENT EXPENSE PER STUDENT IN THE
SENDING COUNTY; OR
(II) THE LOCAL CURRENT EXPENSE PER STUDENT IN THE
RECEIVING COUNTY.
(3) IF THE LOCAL CURRENT EXPENSE PER STUDENT IN THE SENDING
COUNTY IS LESS THAN THE LOCAL CURRENT EXPENSE PER STUDENT IN THE
RECEIVING COUNTY, THE STATE SHALL PROVIDE THE DIFFERENCE TO THE
RECEIVING COUNTY BOARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.